Florida, session 2026, SB64.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) and subsection 12 (5) of section 766.101, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 13 766.101âMedical review committee, immunity from liability.â 14 (1)âAs used in this section: 15 (a)âThe term âmedical review committeeâ or âcommitteeâ 16 means: 17 1.a.âA committee of a hospital or ambulatory surgical 18 center licensed under chapter 395 or a health maintenance 19 organization certificated under part I of chapter 641; 20 b.âA committee of a physician-hospital organization, a 21 provider-sponsored organization, or an integrated delivery 22 system; 23 c.âA committee of a state or local professional society of 24 health care providers; 25 d.âA committee of a medical staff of a licensed hospital or 26 nursing home, provided the medical staff operates pursuant to 27 written bylaws that have been approved by the governing board of 28 the hospital or nursing home; 29 e.âA committee of the Department of Corrections or the 30 Correctional Medical Authority as created under s. 945.602, or 31 employees, agents, or consultants of either the department or 32 the authority or both; 33 f.âA committee of a professional service corporation formed 34 under chapter 621 or a corporation organized under part I of 35 chapter 607 or chapter 617, which is formed and operated for the 36 practice of medicine as defined in s. 458.305(3), and which has 37 at least 25 health care providers who routinely provide health 38 care services directly to patients; 39 g.âA committee of the Department of Children and Families 40 or a managing entity as defined in s. 394.9082(2), which may 41 include includes employees or, agents of, or consultants to the 42 department or managing entity and any other persons the 43 department or managing entity deems as deemed necessary to 44 provide peer review, utilization review, or and mortality review 45 of treatment services provided pursuant to chapters 394, 397, 46 and 916; 47 h.âA committee of a mental health treatment facility 48 licensed under chapter 394 or a community mental health center 49 as defined in s. 394.907, provided the quality assurance program 50 operates pursuant to the guidelines that have been approved by 51 the governing board of the agency; 52 i.âA committee of a substance abuse treatment and education 53 prevention program licensed under chapter 397 provided the 54 quality assurance program operates pursuant to the guidelines 55 that have been approved by the governing board of the agency; 56 j.âA peer review or utilization review committee organized 57 under chapter 440; 58 k.âA committee of the Department of Health, a county health 59 department, healthy start coalition, or certified rural health 60 network, when reviewing quality of care, or employees of these 61 entities when reviewing mortality records; or 62 l.âA continuous quality improvement committee of a pharmacy 63 licensed pursuant to chapter 465, 64 65 which committee is formed to evaluate and improve the quality of 66 health care rendered by providers of health service, to 67 determine whether that health services rendered were 68 professionally indicated or were performed in compliance with 69 the applicable standard of care, or whether that the cost of 70 health care rendered was considered reasonable by the providers 71 of professional health services in the area; or 72 2.âA committee of an insurer, self-insurer, or joint 73 underwriting association of medical malpractice insurance, or 74 other persons conducting review under s. 766.106. 75 (5)âThe investigations, proceedings, and records of a 76 committee as described in the preceding subsections are shall 77 not be subject to discovery or introduction into evidence in any 78 civil or administrative action against a provider of 79 professional health services or a managing entity arising out of 80 the matters which are the subject of evaluation and review by 81 such committee, and any no person who was in attendance at a 82 meeting of such committee is not shall be permitted or required 83 to testify in any such civil action as to any evidence or other 84 matters produced or presented during the proceedings of such 85 committee or as to any findings, recommendations, evaluations, 86 opinions, or other actions of such committee or any members 87 thereof. However, information, documents, or records otherwise 88 available from original sources are not to be construed as 89 immune from discovery or use in any such civil action merely 90 because they were presented during proceedings of such 91 committee, nor should any person who testifies before such 92 committee or who is a member of such committee be prevented from 93 testifying as to matters within his or her knowledge, but the 94 said witness cannot be asked about his or her testimony before 95 such a committee or opinions formed by him or her as a result of 96 such said committee hearings. 97 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.